Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.545.010

School district divisions—High and nonhigh.

For the purposes of this chapter all school districts in the state of Washington shall be and the same are hereby divided into two divisions to be known and designated respectively as high school districts and nonhigh school districts.

[ 1983 c 3 s 31; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.44.045. Prior: 1917 c 21 s 1; RRS s 4710. Formerly RCW 28A.44.045, 28.44.045, 28.01.040, part.]